Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska8-2502
Written solicitation; restriction on use of loan information; exception.

Except as provided in section 8-2503, no person shall include a consumer's loan number, loan amount, or other specific loan information, whether or not publicly available, in a written solicitation for products or services without the consent of the consumer, unless the solicitation clearly and conspicuously states, when applicable, that the person is not sponsored by or affiliated with the financial institution, that the statement is not authorized by the financial institution, and that the consumer's loan information was not provided to that person by the financial institution. The statement shall be made in close proximity to, and in the same or larger font as, the first and the most prominent use or uses of the consumer's loan information in the statement, including on an envelope or through an envelope window containing the statement. The prohibition in this section does not apply to communications by a financial institution or any of its affiliates, subsidiaries, or agents with a current customer of the financial institution or with a person who has been a customer of the financial institution.

Laws 2005, LB 533, § 26.